Hawaii statutes.
§5-6 Seal; commercial use. Whoever
uses any representation of the great seal or the coat of arms of the State in
any advertisement or for any commercial purpose or in any manner likely to give
the impression of official State approval shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
The preceding sentence shall not be construed to apply to the use of the seal
or the coat of arms in any newspaper, periodical, book or pamphlet wherein the
seal or coat of arms is printed for informational purposes only. [L 1967, c 86,
§1; HRS §5-6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next